District of Columbia statutes.
8-2141.01

Annual mosquito control and abatement plan.

Beginning March 31, 2013, and annually thereafter, the Department of Health shall develop and submit to the Council a mosquito-abatement plan, delineated by ward, for the following fiscal year to prevent and abate the infestation of mosquitoes, which shall, at a minimum, include a:

(1)

Determination of which wards are in greatest need of mosquito abatement;

(2)

Plan of action to eliminate the habitats of immature mosquitoes and control immature and adult mosquitoes;

(3)

Plan to ensure that eradication measures are not injurious to pets or wildlife; and

(4)

Delineation of the costs associated with the entire plan.

Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 5022, 59 DCR 8025